Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin VEHICLE PLATOON PLAN AUTHORIZED.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin (c) "Relevant road authority" means Wilkin County for vehicle platoon plan locations specified in subdivision 4, paragraphs (b) to (e), and both Wilkin County and Grant County for the vehicle platoon plan location specified in subdivision 4, paragraph (f). new text end new text begin (d) "State highway" means a highway on the trunk highway system. new text end new text begin (e) "Vehicle platoon" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 169.011, subdivision 92a. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Vehicle platoon plan; required information; authority. new text end new text begin (a) In addition to seeking approval to use a platooning system from the commissioner under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.881, a person may apply to a relevant road authority for approval to use a platooning system for a combination of locations or all locations specified in subdivision 4. In addition to the commissioner, the road authority may grant or deny a vehicle platoon plan submitted under this section. For the locations specified in subdivision 4, paragraph (f), both Wilkin County and Grant County must approve the vehicle platoon plan for segments within their respective jurisdictions. new text end new text begin (b) Approval from both the relevant road authority and the commissioner must be granted before the platoon begins operation. new text end new text begin (c) A vehicle platoon plan authorized under this section and Minnesota Statutes, section 169.881, is valid until expiration of the pilot project. The relevant road authority must provide written notice to the applicant and the commissioner if a vehicle platoon plan is denied and must list the reasons for denial. The relevant road authority must approve or deny a vehicle platoon plan within 60 days of receiving an application. new text end new text begin (d) The relevant road authority must consult with local and county law enforcement regarding any identifiable public safety or traffic concerns before approving a vehicle platoon plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Requirements; operations. new text end new text begin (a) Vehicle platoon plans submitted to a relevant road authority for approval to use a platooning system at the locations specified in subdivision 4 must include but are not limited to the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the total length of the vehicle platoon; new text end new text begin (2) the configuration of the vehicle platoon, including spacing between vehicles; new text end new text begin (3) proposed time frames the vehicle platoon will be operating in a specified location; new text end new text begin (4) certification that each human driver in the vehicle platoon has a valid driver's license for the type or class of vehicle being driven; new text end new text begin (5) certification that vehicle height, width, and weight limits conform to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 169; and new text end new text begin (6) vehicle identification information. new text end new text begin (b) The approved vehicle platoon plan may include reasonable conditions and restrictions to ensure public safety, minimize congestion, avoid road construction or other construction projects, and prevent undue damage to roads or structures. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Locations. new text end new text begin (a) A platooning system under this section may only be operated in the following special locations. new text end new text begin (b) In the city of Nashua to the city of Breckenridge on the following roads: new text end new text begin (1) 3157 State Highway 55 to State Highway 55 West; new text end new text begin (2) State Highway 55 West to State Highway 9 North; new text end new text begin (3) State Highway 9 North to U.S. Highway 75 North; and new text end new text begin (4) U.S. Highway 75 North in the city of Breckenridge to North Dakota Highway 210 to the North Dakota border. new text end new text begin (c) In the city of Wolverton to the city of Breckenridge on the following roads: new text end new text begin (1) 1760 110th Street to Wilkin County State-Aid Highway 32 West; new text end new text begin (2) Wilkin County State-Aid Highway 32 West to Wilkin County State-Aid Highway 3 South; new text end new text begin (3) Wilkin County State-Aid Highway 3 South to U.S. Highway 75 South; and new text end new text begin (4) U.S. Highway 75 South in the city of Breckenridge to North Dakota Highway 210 to the North Dakota border. new text end new text begin (d) In the city of Foxhome to the city of Breckenridge on the following roads: new text end new text begin (1) 3350 290th Avenue to 290th Avenue South; new text end new text begin (2) 290th Avenue South to State Highway 210 West; new text end new text begin (3) State Highway 210 West to U.S. Highway 75 North; and new text end new text begin (4) U.S. Highway 75 North in the city of Breckenridge to North Dakota Highway 210 to the North Dakota border. new text end new text begin (e) In the city of Doran to the city of Breckenridge on the following roads: new text end new text begin (1) 4103 320th Avenue to Wilkin County State-Aid Highway 8 West; new text end new text begin (2) Wilkin County State-Aid Highway 8 West to State Highway 9 North; new text end new text begin (3) State Highway 9 North to U.S. Highway 75 North; and new text end new text begin (4) U.S. Highway 75 North in the city of Breckenridge to North Dakota Highway 210 to the North Dakota border. new text end new text begin (f) In the city of Norcross in Grant County to the city of Breckenridge on the following roads: new text end new text begin (1) the Minn-Dak Farmers Cooperative pilings location at ....... to Grant County State-Aid Highway 8 East; new text end new text begin (2) Grant County State-Aid Highway 8 East to State Highway 9 North; new text end new text begin (3) State Highway 9 North to U.S. Highway 75 North; and new text end new text begin (4) U.S. Highway 75 North in the city of Breckenridge to North Dakota Highway 210 to the North Dakota border. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin Vehicle platoon plans approved under this section expire on January 1, 2030. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report required. new text end new text begin By January 1, 2029, relevant road authorities and the commissioner approving a vehicle platoon plan under this section must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation finance and policy. The report must analyze and evaluate: new text end new text begin (1) the impact of approved vehicle platoon plans on different road segments and pavement types; new text end new text begin (2) the impact on traffic patterns and public safety for approved vehicle platoon plans; new text end new text begin (3) whether the relevant road authority engaged in public awareness campaigns; new text end new text begin (4) the technical and administrative challenges for managing and evaluating vehicle platoon plans submitted under this section; new text end new text begin (5) whether vehicle platoon plans approved under this section should be made permanent at the specified locations in subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (6) whether vehicle platoon plans should be expanded to other locations across the state; and new text end new text begin (7) the challenges for adopting statewide vehicle platoon plans and how the commissioner would administer a statewide program in coordination with local road authorities. new text end